Arkansas, session 2025, SB140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 79, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 29 — Mandate for Use of Biosimilar Medicines

23-79-2901. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Beneficiary" means an individual who is entitled to receive
healthcare services under the terms of a health benefit plan;
(2) "Biosimilar medicine" means a biological product that is:
(A) Licensed under 42 U.S.C.§ 262(k), as it existed on
January 1, 2025; and
*ANS115*
03-10-2025 10:27:34 ANS115

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 S3/10/25 SB140
(B) Not listed as discontinued in the United States Food
and Drug Administration’s Database of Licensed Biological Products, commonly
known as the "Purple Book";
(3) "Brand drug" means a drug product for which an application
has been approved under 21 U.S.C. § 355(c), as it existed on January 1, 2025,
or a biological product, other than a biosimilar medicine, that is licensed
under 42 U.S.C. § 262(a), as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(4) "Formulary" means:
(A) A list of prescription drug products and biological
products that is developed by a pharmacy and therapeutics committee or other
clinical and pharmacy experts; and
(B) Represents a health benefit plan’s prescription drug
products and biological products approved for use;
(5) "Generic drug" means a drug product:
(A) For which an application has been approved under 21
U.S.C. § 355(j), as it existed on January 1, 2025; and
(B) That has been listed in the United States Food and
Drug Administration’s Approved Drug Products with Therapeutic Equivalence
Evaluations, commonly known as the "Orange Book" as therapeutically
equivalent to a reference listed drug, even if the manufacturer of the drug
product applies a trade name to the drug;
(6)(A) "Health benefit plan" means an individual, blanket, or
group plan, policy, or contract for healthcare services offered, issued,
renewed, delivered, or extended in this state by a healthcare insurer.
(B) “Health benefit plan” includes:
(i) Indemnity and managed care plans; and
(ii) Nonfederal governmental plans as defined in 29
U.S.C. § 1002(32), as it existed on January 1, 2025, including plans
providing health benefits to state and public school employees under § 21-5-
401 et seq.
(C) “Health benefit plan” does not include:
(i) A plan that provides only dental benefits or eye
and vision care benefits;
(ii) A disability income plan;
(iii) A credit insurance plan;
(iv) Insurance coverage issued as a supplement to
03-10-2025 10:27:34 ANS115

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 S3/10/25 SB140
liability insurance;
(v) A medical payment under an automobile or
homeowners insurance plan;
(vi) A health benefit plan provided under Arkansas
Constitution, Article 5, § 32, the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et
seq., or the Public Employee Workers' Compensation Act, § 21-5-601 et seq.;
(vii) A plan that provides only indemnity for
hospital confinement;
(viii) An accident-only plan;
(ix) A specified disease plan;
(x) A long-term-care-only plan; or
(xi) The Arkansas Medicaid Program;
(7)(A) "Healthcare insurer" means an entity subject to the
insurance laws of this state or the jurisdiction of the Insurance
Commissioner that contracts or offers to contract to provide health insurance
coverage, including without limitation an insurance company, a hospital and
medical service corporation, a health maintenance organization, or a self-
insured governmental or church plan in this state.
(B) "Healthcare insurer" does not include:
(i) An entity that provides only dental benefits or
eye and vision care benefits; or
(ii) The Arkansas Medicaid Program;
(8) "Healthcare provider" means a type of provider that renders
healthcare services to patients for compensation including a doctor of
medicine or another licensed healthcare professional acting within the
provider's licensed scope of practice;
(9) "Limited distribution drug" means a prescription medication
that is restricted by a pharmaceutical manufacturer to a limited number of
specialty pharmacies due to the prescription medication's:
(A) Complex use, including special handling, monitoring,
or administration;
(B) High cost; or
(C) Safety concerns;
(10) "Reference listed drug" means the listed drug product
identified by the United States Food and Drug Administration as a drug
product upon which an applicant relies in seeking approval of the applicant's
03-10-2025 10:27:34 ANS115

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 S3/10/25 SB140
application submitted under 21 U.S.C. § 355(j), as it existed on January 1,
2025;
(11) "Reference product" means a single biological product that
is licensed by the United States Food and Drug Administration under 42 U.S.C.
§ 262(a), as it existed on January 1, 2025, against which a proposed
biosimilar medicine or interchangeable biological product is compared and
listed as a reference product in the United States Food and Drug
Administration’s Database of Licensed Biological Products, commonly known as
the "Purple Book"; and
(12) "Wholesale acquisition cost" means the same as defined in
section 1847A(c)(6)(B) of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1395w-3a, as
it existed on January 1, 2025.

23-79-2902. Formulary.
(a) A health benefit plan shall publish in a manner that is easily
accessible to a beneficiary, a prospective beneficiary, the state, and the
public an up-to-date, accurate, and complete list of all covered drug
products and biological products on the health benefit plan's formulary,
including without limitation:
(1) A tiering structure that has been adopted for the health
benefit plan; and
(2) Any restrictions on the manner in which a drug product or
biological product can be obtained.
(b) A formulary is easily accessible under subsection (a) of this
section if:
(1) The formulary can be viewed on the health benefit plan’s
public website through a clearly identifiable link or tab without requiring
an individual to create or access an account or enter a policy number; and
(2) An individual can easily discern which formulary list
applies to which health benefit plan if a healthcare insurer offers more than
one (1) health benefit plan.
(c) If a change is made to the formulary of a health benefit plan
during the plan year, the easily accessible formulary shall:
(1) Be updated within thirty (30) calendar days; and
(2) Contain, in bold type, the date of the update, with the
updates clearly identifiable.
03-10-2025 10:27:34 ANS115

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 S3/10/25 SB140

23-79-2903. Generic drugs.
(a) If a generic drug is marketed pursuant to such approval, and has a
wholesale acquisition cost that is less than the wholesale acquisition cost
of the reference listed drug on the generic drug’s initial date of marketing,
then a health benefit plan that provides coverage for the generic drug’s
reference listed drug at the time of the generic drug’s marketing date shall:
(1) Within a reasonable amount of time make the generic drug
available on the formulary with more favorable cost sharing, including
without limitation actual out-of-pocket costs, relative to the reference
listed drug; and
(2) Not impose:
(A) A prior authorization, a step therapy requirement, or
other limitation on coverage of a generic drug for which formulary placement
is required under this section with the exception of limited distribution
drugs; or
(B) A restriction on a pharmacy through which a
beneficiary may obtain the generic drug that makes it more difficult for the
beneficiary to obtain coverage of or access to the generic drug than to
obtain coverage of or access to the reference listed drug.
(b) This section shall remain in force as long as the wholesale
acquisition cost of a generic drug is lower than the wholesale acquisition
cost of the generic drug's reference listed drug.

23-79-2904. Biosimilar medicines.
(a) If a biosimilar medicine is marketed pursuant to such licensure,
and has a wholesale acquisition cost that is less than the wholesale
acquisition cost of the reference product of the biosimilar medicine on the
initial date of marketing, then a health benefit plan that provide coverage
for the biosimilar medicine’s reference product at the time of the biosimilar
medicine’s marketing date shall:
(1) Within a reasonable amount of time make at least one (1)
biosimilar medicine available on the formulary on a tier with more favorable
cost sharing, including actual out-of-pocket costs, relative to the reference
product; and
(2) Not impose:
03-10-2025 10:27:34 ANS115

As Engrossed: S2/5/25 S3/10/25 SB140
(A) A prior authorization, a step therapy requirement, or
other limitation on coverage of a biosimilar medicine for which formulary
placement is required under this section with the exception of limited
distribution drugs; or
(B) A restriction on an accredited pharmacy through which
a beneficiary may obtain the biosimilar medicine that makes it more difficult
for a beneficiary to obtain coverage of or access to the biosimilar medicine
than to obtain coverage of or access to the reference product.
(b) This section shall remain in force as long as the wholesale
acquisition cost of a biosimilar medicine is lower than the wholesale
acquisition cost of the biosimilar medicine's reference product.

23-79-2905. Purpose and construction of subchapter.
(a) A health benefit plan is not required under this subchapter to:
(1) Continue providing coverage for a brand drug after a generic
drug or biosimilar medicine is approved or licensed, as applicable, and
marketed; or
(2) Provide coverage for a brand drug, generic drug, biological
product, or biosimilar medicine if the pharmacy and therapeutics committee or
the clinical and pharmacy experts that develop the health benefit plan’s
formulary determines that the brand drug, generic drug, biological product,
or biosimilar medicine is no longer medically appropriate or cost-effective.
(b) The application of this subchapter shall not interfere with or
prevent a pharmacy from the practice of pharmacy as defined in § 17-92-101.

23-79-2906. Rules.
(a) The Insurance Commissioner may promulgate rules necessary to
implement this subchapter.
(b) The State Board of Finance may promulgate rules necessary to
implement this subchapter that may apply to the State and Public School Life
and Health Insurance Program.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Effective date. This act is effective on
and after January 1, 2026.

/s/J. Boyd
03-10-2025 10:27:34 ANS115